Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202079-2503
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Expanded Learning Opportunity Grant Program Act:

(1) Community learning center has the definition found in 20 U.S.C. 7171(b)(1), as such section existed on January 1, 2015;

(2) Department means the State Department of Education;

(3) Expanded learning opportunity program means a school-community partnership that provides participating elementary-age and secondary-age students and their families with programming and other support activities and services after school and on weekends, holidays, and other hours when school is not in session through a mix of programs and services that (a) complement but do not duplicate elementary and secondary school day learning and (b) create opportunities to strengthen school-community partnerships that provide students and their families with the support they need to be successful in school; and

(4) High-need school district means a school district in which forty percent or more of the enrolled students qualify for free and reduced price meals under the National School Lunch Program, 7 C.F.R. part 210, as such regulations existed on January 1, 2015.

Laws 2015, LB519, § 17.